District of Columbia statutes.
21-588

Forms.

All applications and certificates for the hospitalization of a person in the District of Columbia under this chapter shall be made on forms approved by the Commission on Mental Health and furnished by it.

History

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 760, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1

Section References

This section is referenced in § 21-589.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 21-588.
1973 Ed., § 21-588.